Connecticut, session 2026, SB00103.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That chapter 229 of the general statutes be amended to establish a
refundable child tax credit against the personal income tax for up to
three children, in the amount of one hundred fifty dollars per child for
the taxable year commencing January 1, 2026, and phasing up to six
hundred dollars per child over the three taxable years next succeeding,
provided such amount be reduced five per cent for every one thousand
dollars or fraction thereof of federal adjusted gross income over (1) one
hundred thousand dollars for an unmarried individual or a married
individual filing separately, (2) one hundred sixty thousand dollars for
a head of household, and (3) two hundred thousand dollars for married
individuals filing jointly.